Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,140
Multiple licenses; violation; penalty.

No person who operates a commercial motor vehicle upon the highways of this state shall at any time have more than one operator's license issued by any state. Any person who violates this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 90.